California, session 20252026, SB1029.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3073 of the Civil Code is amended to read:3073. The proceeds of a vehicle lien sale under this chapter shall be disposed of as follows:(a) The amount necessary to discharge the lien and the cost of processing the vehicle shall be paid to the lienholder. The cost of processing shall not exceed seventy dollars ($70) for each vehicle valued at four thousand dollars ($4,000) or less, or one hundred dollars ($100) for each vehicle valued over four thousand dollars ($4,000).(b) (1)The balance, if any, shall be forwarded to the Department of Motor Vehicles Controller within 15 days of any sale conducted pursuant to Section 3071 or within five days of any sale conducted pursuant to Section 3072 and deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, shall be treated as escheated property in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, unless federal law requires these funds to be disposed in a different manner.(2)Within 14 days of receipt of the balance, as specified in paragraph (1), the Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide notice specifying the amount of funds from the lien sale that were forwarded to the department and how to file a claim pursuant to subdivision (c), by certified mail and with return receipt requested, to each of the following:(A)The registered and legal owners of the vehicle.(B)All persons known to have an interest in the vehicle.(c)Any person claiming an interest in the vehicle may file a claim with the Department of Motor Vehicles for any portion of the funds from the lien sale that were forwarded to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). Upon a determination of the Department of Motor Vehicles that the claimant is entitled to an amount from the balance deposited with the department, the department shall pay that amount determined by the department, which amount shall not exceed the amount forwarded to the department pursuant to subdivision (b) in connection with the sale of the vehicle in which the claimant claims an interest. The department shall not honor any claim unless the claim has been filed within three years of the date the funds were deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.